District of Columbia statutes.
50-2303.02

Exceptions for serious offenders.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the provisions of this subchapter shall not apply to a person alleged to have committed a parking, standing, or stopping infraction who, during the 18 months immediately preceding the date of the infraction, has been assessed in excess of $750 in fines, including any penalties imposed by law for failure to timely pay such fines. Such person shall be subject to criminal prosecution by the Corporation Counsel for such offense in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisonment of up to 10 days, or both, for each infraction.

(b)

The Director shall promptly inform the Corporation Counsel of an infraction by any person who has accumulated in excess of $750 in fines pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. If the Corporation Counsel asserts jurisdiction over such person, he may be prosecuted without respect to the provisions of this chapter; provided, that if the Corporation Counsel affirmatively declines to take jurisdiction or does not assert jurisdiction over such offender within 15 calendar days of his receipt of notification by the Director of a violation by such person, such violation shall be adjudicated as a civil infraction pursuant to this subchapter.

(c)

A person over whom the Corporation Counsel asserts jurisdiction pursuant to this section shall be notified that his infraction shall be treated as a criminal matter. Such notification shall be sent by the Corporation Counsel by certified mail directed to the recorded address of such person. No actions or statements of the respondent made in compliance or attempted compliance with this chapter before the receipt of such notice, including but not limited to admissions or admissions with explanation, shall be admissible in any such criminal proceeding.

History

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, § 302, 25 DCR 1275
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 275(b), 60 DCR 2064

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-2303.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-622.
1973 Ed., § 40-1116.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not to exceed $300” in (a).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(a) of Street Sweeping Improvement Enforcement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-458, July 28, 2008, 55 DCR 8723).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 275(b) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.